Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 2. Fishing Preserves

§ 23-5-201.
Department authorized to issue licenses.

The department upon application and payment of the proper fee shall issue licenses for fishing preserves permitting the acquisition, possession, and rearing of fish therein.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-100.

§ 23-5-202.
“Fishing preserve waters” defined.

“Fishing preserve waters” means any artificial or man-made body of water not exceeding one hundred (100) surface acres, lying wholly within the boundaries of privately owned lands, operated for the purpose of permitting the owner to provide fishing facilities for fishermen. It does not include natural streams, natural ponds or waters impounded by the damming of natural streams with a normal stream flow in excess of five (5) second feet. It is unlawful to use such natural waters as a fishing preserve. The sources of water for fishing preserve waters are limited to surface runoff, natural springs, wells, or waters lawfully diverted from a natural stream, or the damming of natural streams with a normal stream flow of five (5) second feet or less.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-101.

§ 23-5-203.
Issuance of license; separate license required for each body of water; contents of license.

The department shall, after application and payment of the proper fee, issue to an owner of fishing preserve waters a fishing preserve license permitting the holder to manage the fishing preserve waters and to possess, rear and to take or permit others to take therefrom, fish acquired from any legal source. A separate license is required for each body of water defined in this act as fishing preserve waters. Two (2) or more ponds under one (1) ownership, supplied by one (1) common water source and located on one (1) continuous parcel of land, shall be considered as one (1) body of water requiring one (1) license.

The license so issued shall:

Specify the species of fish authorized to be stocked therein;

Specify the source of acquisition of fish stocked therein;

Specify the means, if any, to be used to trap the fish below the licensed waters.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-102.

§ 23-5-204.
Permission to take fish from licensed waters; fee or dues; fishing license not required; receipts for removal of fish.

Any licensee, during the term of his license, may grant permission to other persons to take fish in or from the licensed fishing preserve waters and to charge a fee for fishing, or if a club, to impose dues permitting such angling by members of the club. No fishing license is required to fish in any licensed fishing preserve waters. The licensee shall issue a receipt to any person removing fish from licensed premises. The receipt shall be provided by the department.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-103.